Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 70. Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.
Sec. 47.70.010.
Compact enacted.

The Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children as contained in this section is enacted into law and entered into on behalf of the state with any and all other states legally joining in it in a form substantially as follows:

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1976)

INTERSTATE COMPACT ON THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN.

Article I. Purpose and Policy

It is the purpose and policy of the party states to cooperate with each other in the interstate placement of children to the end that:

Each child requiring placement shall receive the maximum opportunity to be placed in a suitable environment and with persons or institutions having appropriate qualifications and facilities to provide a necessary and desirable degree and type of care.

The appropriate authorities in a state where a child is to be placed may have full opportunity to ascertain the circumstances of the proposed placement, thereby promoting full compliance with applicable requirements for the protection of the child.

The proper authorities of the state from which the placement is made may obtain the most complete information on the basis of which to evaluate a projected placement before it is made.

Appropriate jurisdictional arrangements for the care of children will be promoted.

Article II. Definitions

As used in this compact:

“Child” means a person who, by reason of minority, is legally subject to parental, guardianship or similar control.

“Sending agency” means a party state, officer or employee thereof; a subdivision of a party state, or officer or employee thereof; a court of a party state; a person, corporation, association, charitable agency or other entity which sends, brings, or causes to be sent or brought any child to another party state.

“Receiving state” means the state to which a child is sent, brought, or caused to be sent or brought, whether by public authorities or private persons or agencies, and whether for placement with state or local public authorities or for placement with private agencies or persons.

“Placement” means the arrangement for the care of a child in a family free or boarding home or in a child-caring agency or institution but does not include any institution caring for the mentally ill, mentally defective or epileptic or any institution primarily educational in character, and any hospital or other medical facility.

Article III. Conditions for Placement

No sending agency shall send, bring, or cause to be sent or brought into any other party state any child for placement in foster care or as a preliminary to a possible adoption unless the sending agency shall comply with each and every requirement set forth in this article and with the applicable laws of the receiving state governing the placement of children therein.

Prior to sending, bringing or causing any child to be sent or brought into a receiving state for placement in foster care or as a preliminary to a possible adoption, the sending agency shall furnish the appropriate public authorities in the receiving state written notice of the intention to send, bring, or place the child in the receiving state. The notice shall contain:

The name, date and place of birth of the child.

The identity and address or addresses of the parents or legal guardian.

The name and address of the person, agency or institution to or with which the sending agency proposes to send, bring, or place the child.

A full statement of the reasons for such proposed action and evidence of the authority pursuant to which the placement is proposed to be made.

Any public officer or agency in a receiving state which is in receipt of a notice pursuant to paragraph (b) of this article may request of the sending agency, or any other appropriate officer or agency of or in the sending agency’s state, and shall be entitled to receive therefrom, such supporting or additional information as it may deem necessary under the circumstances to carry out the purpose and policy of this compact.

The child shall not be sent, brought, or caused to be sent or brought into the receiving state until the appropriate public authorities in the receiving state shall notify the sending agency, in writing, to the effect that the proposed placement does not appear to be contrary to the interests of the child.

Article IV. Penalty for Illegal Placement

The sending, bringing, or causing to be sent or brought into any receiving state of a child in violation of the terms of this compact shall constitute a violation of the laws respecting the placement of children of both the state in which the sending agency is located or from which it sends or brings the child and of the receiving state.
Such violations may be punished or subjected to penalty in either jurisdiction in accordance with its laws.
In addition to liability for any such punishment or penalty, any such violation shall constitute full and sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of any license, permit, or other legal authorization held by the sending agency which empowers or allows it to place, or care for children.

Article V. Retention of Jurisdiction

The sending agency shall retain jurisdiction over the child sufficient to determine all matters in relation to the custody, supervision, care, treatment and disposition of the child which it would have had if the child had remained in the sending agency’s state, until the child is adopted, reaches majority, becomes self-supporting or is discharged with the concurrence of the appropriate authority in the receiving state. Such jurisdiction shall also include the power to effect or cause the return of the child or its transfer to another location and custody pursuant to law. The sending agency shall continue to have financial responsibility for support and maintenance of the child during the period of the placement. Nothing contained herein shall defeat a claim of jurisdiction by a receiving state sufficient to deal with an act of delinquency or crime committed therein.

When the sending agency is a public agency, it may enter into an agreement with an authorized public or private agency in the receiving state providing for the performance of one or more services in respect of such case by the latter as agent for the sending agency.

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prevent a private charitable agency authorized to place children in the receiving state from performing services or acting as agent in that state for a private charitable agency of the sending state; nor to prevent the agency in the receiving state from discharging financial responsibility for the support and maintenance of a child who has been placed on behalf of the sending agency without relieving the responsibility set forth in paragraph (a) hereof.

Article VI. Institutional Care of Delinquent Children

A child adjudicated delinquent may be placed in an institution in another party jurisdiction pursuant to this compact but no such placement shall be made unless the child is given a court hearing on notice to the parent or guardian with opportunity to be heard, before the child is sent to such other party jurisdiction for institutional care and the court finds that:

Equivalent facilities for the child are not available in the sending agency’s jurisdiction; and

Institutional care in the other jurisdiction is in the best interest of the child and will not produce undue hardship.

Article VII.
Compact Administrator

The executive head of each jurisdiction party to this compact shall designate an officer who shall be general coordinator of activities under this compact in the officer’s jurisdiction and who, acting jointly with like officers of other party jurisdictions, shall have power to adopt regulations to carry out more effectively the terms and provisions of this compact.

Article VIII.
Limitations

This compact does not apply to

The sending or bringing of a child into a receiving state by the child’s parent, step-parent, grandparent, adult brother or sister, adult uncle or aunt, or guardian and leaving the child with any such relative or non-agency guardian in the receiving state.

Any placement, sending or bringing of a child into a receiving state pursuant to any other interstate compact to which both the state from which the child is sent or brought and the receiving state are party, or to any other agreement between said states which has the force of law.

Article IX.
Enactment and Withdrawal

This compact shall be open to joinder by any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and, with the consent of Congress, the Government of Canada or any province thereof. It shall become effective with respect to any such jurisdiction when such jurisdiction has enacted the same into law. Withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same, but shall not take effect until two years after the effective date of such statute and until written notice of the withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the governor of each other party jurisdiction. Withdrawal of a party state shall not affect the rights, duties and obligations under this compact of any sending agency therein with respect to a placement made prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

Article X.
Construction and Severability

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes thereof.
The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state party thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

Delayed amendment of section. —

Section 11(a),
ch. 93, SLA 2008, makes an amendment conditional upon ratification of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children by at least 34 other states. As of May 2022, the required ratifications had not occurred. If the condition occurs, the amendment takes effect “on the day after the date on which the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner's designee notifies the revisor of statutes that the contingency has occurred.”

If the amendment does take effect, under §
1, ch. 93, SLA 2008, this section will read as follows: “Compact enacted. The Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children as contained in this section is enacted into law and entered into on behalf of the state with all other states legally joining in it in a form substantially as follows:

“ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

“The purpose of this Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children is to:

“ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

“(A) Provide a process through which children subject to this compact are placed in safe and suitable homes in a timely manner.

“ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

“(B) Facilitate ongoing supervision of a placement, the delivery of services, and communication between the states.

“ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

“(C) Provide operating procedures that will ensure that children are placed in safe and suitable homes in a timely manner.

“ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

“(D) Provide for the promulgation and enforcement of administrative rules implementing the provisions of this compact and regulating the covered activities of the member states.

“ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

“(E) Provide for uniform data collection and information sharing between member states under this compact.

“ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

“(F) Promote coordination between this compact, the Interstate Compact for Juveniles, the Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance and other compacts affecting the placement of and which provide services to children otherwise subject to this compact.

“ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

“(G) Provide for a state’s continuing legal jurisdiction and responsibility for placement and care of a child that it would have had if the placement were intrastate.

“ARTICLE I. PURPOSE

“(H) Provide for the promulgation of guidelines, in collaboration with Indian tribes, for interstate cases involving Indian children as is or may be permitted by federal law.

“INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN.

“(A) Provide a process through which children subject to this compact are placed in safe and suitable homes in a timely manner.

“INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN.

“(B) Facilitate ongoing supervision of a placement, the delivery of services, and communication between the states.

“INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN.

“(C) Provide operating procedures that will ensure that children are placed in safe and suitable homes in a timely manner.

“INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN.

“(D) Provide for the promulgation and enforcement of administrative rules implementing the provisions of this compact and regulating the covered activities of the member states.

“INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN.

“(E) Provide for uniform data collection and information sharing between member states under this compact.

“INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN.

“(F) Promote coordination between this compact, the Interstate Compact for Juveniles, the Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance and other compacts affecting the placement of and which provide services to children otherwise subject to this compact.

“INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN.

“(G) Provide for a state’s continuing legal jurisdiction and responsibility for placement and care of a child that it would have had if the placement were intrastate.

“INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN.

“(H) Provide for the promulgation of guidelines, in collaboration with Indian tribes, for interstate cases involving Indian children as is or may be permitted by federal law.

“(A) Provide a process through which children subject to this compact are placed in safe and suitable homes in a timely manner.

“(B) Facilitate ongoing supervision of a placement, the delivery of services, and communication between the states.

“(C) Provide operating procedures that will ensure that children are placed in safe and suitable homes in a timely manner.

“(D) Provide for the promulgation and enforcement of administrative rules implementing the provisions of this compact and regulating the covered activities of the member states.

“(E) Provide for uniform data collection and information sharing between member states under this compact.

“(F) Promote coordination between this compact, the Interstate Compact for Juveniles, the Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance and other compacts affecting the placement of and which provide services to children otherwise subject to this compact.

“(G) Provide for a state’s continuing legal jurisdiction and responsibility for placement and care of a child that it would have had if the placement were intrastate.

“(H) Provide for the promulgation of guidelines, in collaboration with Indian tribes, for interstate cases involving Indian children as is or may be permitted by federal law.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“As used in this compact,

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(A) “Approved placement” means the public child-placing agency in the receiving state has determined that the placement is both safe and suitable for the child.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(B) “Assessment” means an evaluation of a prospective placement by a public child-placing agency in the receiving state to determine if the placement meets the individualized needs of the child, including but not limited to the child’s safety and stability, health and well-being, and mental, emotional and physical development. An assessment is only applicable to a placement by a public child-placing agency.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(C) “Child” means an individual who has not attained the age of eighteen (18).

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(D) “Certification” means to attest, declare, or swear before a judge or notary public.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(E) “Default” means the failure of a member state to perform the obligations or responsibilities imposed upon it by this compact, the bylaws or rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(F) “Home study” means an evaluation of a home environment conducted in accordance with the applicable requirements of the state in which the home is located, and documents the preparation and the suitability of the placement resource for placement of a child in accordance with the laws and requirements of the state in which the home is located.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(G) “Indian tribe” means any Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community of Indians recognized as eligible for services provided to Indians by the Secretary of the Interior because of their status as Indians, including any Alaskan native village as defined in section 3 (c) of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act at 43 USC 1602(c).

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(H) “Interstate Commission for the Placement of Children” means the commission that is created under Article VIII of this compact and which is generally referred to as the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(I) “Jurisdiction” means the power and authority of a court to hear and decide matters.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(J) “Legal risk” means that a child can be ordered to be returned to the sending state, or the birth mother’s state of residence if different from the sending state, and a final decree of adoption may not be entered in any jurisdiction until all consents are obtained or are dispensed with in accordance with applicable law.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(K) “Member state” means a state that has enacted this compact.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(L) “Non-custodial parent” means a person who, at the time of the commencement of court proceedings in the sending state, does not have sole legal custody of the child or has joint legal custody of a child, and who is not the subject of allegations or findings of child abuse or neglect.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(M) “Non-member state” means a state which has not enacted this compact.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(N) “Notice of residential placement” means information regarding a placement into a residential facility provided to the receiving state including, but not limited to the name, date and place of birth of the child, the identity and address of the parent or legal guardian, evidence of authority to make the placement, and the name and address of the facility in which the child will be placed. Notice of residential placement shall also include information regarding a discharge and any unauthorized absence from the facility.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(O) “Placement” means the act by a public or private child-placing agency intended to arrange for the care or custody of a child in another state.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(P) “Private child-placing agency” means any private corporation, agency, foundation, institution, or charitable organization, or any private person or attorney that facilitates, causes, or is involved in the placement of a child from one state to another and that is not an instrumentality of the state or acting under color of state law.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(Q) “Provisional placement” means a determination made by the public child-placing agency in the receiving state that the proposed placement is safe and suitable, and, to the extent allowable, the receiving state has temporarily waived its standards or requirements otherwise applicable to prospective foster or adoptive parents so as to not delay the placement. Completion of the receiving state requirements regarding training for prospective foster or adoptive parents shall not delay an otherwise safe and suitable placement.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(R) “Public child-placing agency” means any government child welfare agency or child protection agency or a private entity under contract with such an agency, regardless of whether they act on behalf of a state, county, municipality or other governmental unit and which facilitates, causes, or is involved in the placement of a child from one state to another.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(S) “Receiving state” means the state to which a child is sent, brought, or caused to be sent or brought.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(T) “Relative” means someone who is related to the child as a parent, step-parent, sibling by half or whole blood or by adoption, grandparent, aunt, uncle, or first cousin or a non-relative with such significant ties to the child that they may be regarded as relatives as determined by the court in the sending state.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(U) “Residential Facility” means a facility providing a level of care that is sufficient to substitute for parental responsibility or foster care, and is beyond what is needed for assessment or treatment of an acute condition. For purposes of the compact, residential facilities do not include institutions primarily educational in character, hospitals or other medical facilities.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(V) “Rule” means a written directive, mandate, standard or principle issued by the Interstate Commission promulgated pursuant to Article XI of this compact that is of general applicability and that implements, interprets or prescribes a policy or provision of the compact. “Rule” has the force and effect of an administrative regulation in a member state, and includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(W) “Sending state” means the state from which the placement of a child is initiated.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(X) “Service member’s permanent duty station” means the military installation where an active duty Armed Services member is currently assigned and is physically located under competent orders that do not specify the duty as temporary.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(Y) “Service member’s state of legal residence” means the state in which the active duty Armed Services member is considered a resident for tax and voting purposes.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(Z) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the U.S. Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Marianas Islands and any other territory of the United States.

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(AA) “State court” means a judicial body of a state that is vested by law with responsibility for adjudicating cases involving abuse, neglect, deprivation, delinquency or status offenses of individuals who have not attained the age of eighteen (18).

“ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS

“(BB) “Supervision” means monitoring provided by the receiving state once a child has been placed in a receiving state pursuant to this compact.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(A) Except as otherwise provided in Article III, Section B, this compact shall apply to:

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(1) The interstate placement of a child subject to ongoing court jurisdiction in the sending state, due to allegations or findings that the child has been abused, neglected, or deprived as defined by the laws of the sending state, provided, however, that the placement of such a child into a residential facility shall only require notice of residential placement to the receiving state prior to placement.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(2) The interstate placement of a child adjudicated delinquent or unmanageable based on the laws of the sending state and subject to ongoing court jurisdiction of the sending state if:

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(a) the child is being placed in a residential facility in another member state and is not covered under another compact; or

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(b) the child is being placed in another member state and the determination of safety and suitability of the placement and services required is not provided through another compact.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(3) The interstate placement of any child by a public child-placing agency or private child-placing agency as defined in this compact as a preliminary step to a possible adoption.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(B) The provisions of this compact do not apply to:

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(1) The interstate placement of any child by a public child-placing agency or private child-placing agency as defined in this compact as a preliminary step to a possible adoption.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(2) The interstate placement of a child with a non-relative in a receiving state by a parent with the legal authority to make such a placement provided, however, that the placement is not intended to effectuate an adoption.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(3) The interstate placement of a child by one relative with the lawful authority to make such a placement directly with a relative in a receiving state.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(4) The placement of a child, not subject to Article III, Section A, into a residential facility by his parent.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(5) The placement of a child with a non-custodial parent provided that:

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(a) The non-custodial parent proves to the satisfaction of a court in the sending state a substantial relationship with the child; and

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(b) The court in the sending state makes a written finding that placement with the non-custodial parent is in the best interests of the child; and

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(c) The court in the sending state dismisses its jurisdiction over the child’s case.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(6) A child entering the United States from a foreign country for the purpose of adoption or leaving the United States to go to a foreign country for the purpose of adoption in that country.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(7) Cases in which a U.S. citizen child living overseas with his family, at least one of whom is in the U.S. Armed Services, and who is stationed overseas, is removed and placed in a state.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(8) The sending of a child by a public child-placing agency or a private child-placing agency for a visit as defined by the rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(C) For purposes of determining the applicability of this compact to the placement of a child with a family in the Armed Services, the public child-placing agency or private child-placing agency may choose the state of the service member’s permanent duty station or the service member’s declared legal residence.

“ARTICLE III. APPLICABILITY

“(D) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prohibit the concurrent application of the provisions of this compact with other applicable interstate compacts including the Interstate Compact for Juveniles and the Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance. The Interstate Commission may in cooperation with other interstate compact commissions having responsibility for the interstate movement, placement or transfer of children, promulgate like rules to ensure the coordination of services, timely placement of children, and the reduction of unnecessary or duplicative administrative or procedural requirements.

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(A) Except as provided in Article IV, Section (G) and in Article V, Section (B)(2) and (3), concerning private and independent adoptions, and in interstate placements in which the public child-placing agency is not a party to a custody proceeding, the sending state shall retain jurisdiction over a child with respect to all matters of custody and disposition of the child which it would have had if the child had remained in the sending state. Such jurisdiction shall also include the power to order the return of the child to the sending state.

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(B) When an issue of child protection or custody is brought before a court in the receiving state, such court shall confer with the court of the sending state to determine the most appropriate forum for adjudication.

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(C) In accordance with its own laws, the court in the sending state shall have authority to terminate its jurisdiction if:

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(1) The child is reunified with the parent in the receiving state who is the subject of allegations or findings of abuse or neglect, only with the concurrence of the public child-placing agency in the receiving state; or

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(2) The child is adopted; or

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(3) The child reaches the age of majority under the laws of the sending state; or

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(4) The child achieves legal independence pursuant to the laws of the sending state; or

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(5) A guardianship is created by a court in the receiving state with the concurrence of the court in the sending state; or

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(6) An Indian tribe has petitioned for and received jurisdiction from the court in the sending state; or

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(7) The public child-placing agency of the sending state requests termination and has obtained the concurrence of the public child-placing agency in the receiving state.

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(D) When a sending state court terminates its jurisdiction, the receiving state child-placing agency shall be notified.

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(E) Nothing in this article shall defeat a claim of jurisdiction by a receiving state court sufficient to deal with an act of truancy, delinquency, crime or behavior involving a child as defined by the laws of the receiving state committed by the child in the receiving state which would be a violation of its laws.

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(F) Nothing in this article shall limit the receiving state’s ability to take emergency jurisdiction for the protection of the child.

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(G) The substantive laws of the state in which an adoption will be finalized shall solely govern all issues relating to the adoption of a child, and the court in which the adoption proceeding is filed shall have subject matter jurisdiction regarding all substantive issues relating to the adoption, except when:

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(1) the child is a ward of another court that established jurisdiction over the child prior to the placement;

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(2) the child is in the legal custody of a public agency in the sending state; or

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(3) a court in the sending state has otherwise appropriately assumed jurisdiction over the child prior to the submission of the request for approval of placement.

“ARTICLE IV. JURISDICTION

“(H) A final decree of adoption may not be entered in any jurisdiction until the placement is authorized as an “approved placement” by the public child-placing agency in the receiving state.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(A) Prior to sending, bringing, or causing a child to be sent or brought into a receiving state, the public child-placing agency shall provide a written request for assessment to the receiving state.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(B) For placements by a private child-placing agency, a child may be sent or brought, or caused to be sent or brought, into a receiving state, upon receipt and immediate review of the required content in a request for approval of a placement in both the sending and receiving state public child-placing agency. The required content to accompany a request for provisional approval must include all of the following:

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(1) a request for approval identifying the child, the birth parents, the prospective adoptive parents, and the supervising agency, signed by the person requesting approval;

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(2) the appropriate consents or relinquishment is signed by the birth parents in accordance with the laws of the sending state or, when permitted, with the laws of the state where the adoption will be finalized;

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(3) certification by a licensed attorney or authorized agent of a private adoption agency that the consent or relinquishment is in compliance with the applicable laws of the sending state, or when permitted, the laws of the state where finalization of the adoption will occur;

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(4) a home study; and

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(5) an acknowledgment of legal risk signed by the prospective adoptive parents.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(C) The sending state and the receiving state may request additional information or documents prior to finalization of an approved placement, but they may not delay travel by the prospective adoptive parents with the child if the required content for approval has been submitted, received, and reviewed by the public child-placing agency in both the sending state and the receiving state.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(D) Approval from the public-child placing agency in the receiving state for a provisional or approved placement is required as provided for in the rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(E) The procedures for making and the request for an assessment shall contain all information and be in such form as provided for in the rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(F) Upon receipt of a request from the public child-placing agency of the sending state, the receiving state shall initiate an assessment of the proposed placement to determine its safety and suitability. If the proposed placement is a placement with a relative, the public child-placing agency of the sending state may request a determination for a provisional placement.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(G) The public child-placing agency in the receiving state may request from the public child-placing agency or the private child-placing agency in the sending state, and shall be entitled to receive supporting or additional information necessary to complete the assessment.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(H) The public child-placing agency in the receiving state shall approve a provisional placement and complete or arrange for the completion of the assessment within the timeframes established by the rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(I) For a placement by a private child-placing agency, the sending state shall not impose any additional requirements to complete the home study that are not required by the receiving state, unless the adoption is finalized in the sending state.

“ARTICLE V. PLACEMENT EVALUATION

“(J) The Interstate Commission may develop uniform standards for the assessment of the safety and suitability of interstate placements.

“ARTICLE VI. PLACEMENT AUTHORITY

“ARTICLE VI. PLACEMENT AUTHORITY

“(A) Except as provided in this compact, no child subject to this compact shall be placed into a receiving state until approval for such placement is obtained.

“ARTICLE VI. PLACEMENT AUTHORITY

“(B) If the public child-placing agency in the receiving state does not approve the proposed placement then the child shall not be placed. The receiving state shall provide written documentation of any such determination in accordance with the rules promulgated by the Interstate Commission. Such determination is not subject to judicial review in the sending state.

“ARTICLE VI. PLACEMENT AUTHORITY

“(C) If the proposed placement is not approved, any interested party shall have standing to seek an administrative review of the receiving state’s determination.

“ARTICLE VI. PLACEMENT AUTHORITY

“(1) The administrative review and any further judicial review associated with the determination shall be conducted in the receiving state pursuant to its applicable administrative procedures.

“ARTICLE VI. PLACEMENT AUTHORITY

“(2) If a determination not to approve the placement of the child in the receiving state is overturned upon review, the placement shall be deemed approved, provided however that all administrative or judicial remedies have been exhausted or the time for such remedies has passed.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(A) For the interstate placement of a child made by a public child-placing agency or state court:

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(1) The public child-placing agency in the sending state shall have financial responsibility for:

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(a) the ongoing support and maintenance for the child during the period of the placement, unless otherwise provided for in the receiving state; and

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(b) as determined by the public child-placing agency in the sending state, services for the child beyond the public services for which the child is eligible in the receiving state.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(2) The receiving state shall only have financial responsibility for:

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(a) any assessment conducted by the receiving state; and

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(b) supervision conducted by the receiving state at the level necessary to support the placement as agreed upon by the public child-placing agencies of the receiving and sending state.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(3) Nothing in this provision shall prohibit public child-placing agencies in the sending state from entering into agreements with licensed agencies or persons in the receiving state to conduct assessments and provide supervision.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(B) For the placement of a child by a private child-placing agency preliminary to a possible adoption, the private child-placing agency shall be:

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(1) Legally responsible for the child during the period of placement as provided for in the law of the sending state until the finalization of the adoption.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(2) Financially responsible for the child absent a contractual agreement to the contrary.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(C) A private child-placing agency shall be responsible for any assessment conducted in the receiving state and any supervision conducted by the receiving state at the level required by the laws of the receiving state or the rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(D) The public child-placing agency in the receiving state shall provide timely assessments, as provided for in the rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(E) The public child-placing agency in the receiving state shall provide, or arrange for the provision of, supervision and services for the child, including timely reports, during the period of the placement.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(F) Nothing in this compact shall be construed as to limit the authority of the public child-placing agency in the receiving state from contracting with a licensed agency or person in the receiving state for an assessment or the provision of supervision or services for the child or otherwise authorizing the provision of supervision or services by a licensed agency during the period of placement.
